Illinois, session 104th, HB4297.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be referred to as the 5Corrections Family Notification Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose. The General Assembly 7finds: 8        (1) Approved visitors play a critical role in the 9    rehabilitation, stability, and mental health of committed 10    persons. 11        (2) Families often experience fear and confusion when 12    phone contact is suddenly cut off due to facility 13    lockdowns or placement in restrictive housing. 14        (3) Transparency regarding lockdowns and solitary 15    confinement promotes safety, reduces misinformation, and 16    supports healthy family engagement. 17        (4) The purpose of this amendatory Act of the 104th 18    General Assembly is to ensure timely notification to 19    approved visitors when a committed person is placed in 20    lockdown or restrictive housing, and when such conditions 21    end. 22    Section 10. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by   HB4297- 2 -LRB104 17041 RLC 30456 b1changing Section 3-7-2 and by adding Section 3-7-2.1 as 2follows: 3    (730 ILCS 5/3-7-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-7-2)4    Sec. 3-7-2. Facilities. 5    (a) All institutions and facilities of the Department 6shall provide every committed person with access to toilet 7facilities, barber facilities, bathing facilities at least 8once each week, a library of legal materials and published 9materials including newspapers and magazines approved by the 10Director. A committed person may not receive any materials 11that the Director deems pornographic.12    (b) (Blank).13    (c) All institutions and facilities of the Department 14shall provide facilities for every committed person to leave 15his cell for at least one hour each day unless the chief 16administrative officer determines that it would be harmful or 17dangerous to the security or safety of the institution or 18facility.19    (d) All institutions and facilities of the Department 20shall provide every committed person with a wholesome and 21nutritional diet at regularly scheduled hours, drinking water, 22clothing adequate for the season, including underwear, 23bedding, soap, towels, and medical and dental care. Underwear 24provided to each committed person in all institutions and 25facilities of the Department shall be free of charge and shall   HB4297- 3 -LRB104 17041 RLC 30456 b1be provided at any time upon request, including multiple 2requests, of the committed person or as needed by the 3committed person.4    (e) All institutions and facilities of the Department 5shall permit every committed person to send and receive an 6unlimited number of uncensored letters, provided, however, 7that the Director may order that mail be inspected and read for 8reasons of the security, safety, or morale of the institution 9or facility.10    (f) Subject to the notification requirements in Section 113-7-2.1, all All of the institutions and facilities of the 12Department shall permit every committed person to receive 13in-person visitors and video contact, if available, except in 14case of abuse of the visiting privilege or when the chief 15administrative officer determines that such visiting would be 16harmful or dangerous to the security, safety or morale of the 17institution or facility. Each committed person is entitled to 187 visits per month. Every committed person may submit a list of 19at least 30 persons to the Department that are authorized to 20visit the committed person. The list shall be kept in an 21electronic format by the Department beginning on August 1, 222019, as well as available in paper form for Department 23employees. The chief administrative officer shall have the 24right to restrict visitation to non-contact visits, video, or 25other forms of non-contact visits for reasons of safety, 26security, and order, including, but not limited to,   HB4297- 4 -LRB104 17041 RLC 30456 b1restricting contact visits for committed persons engaged in 2gang activity. No committed person in a super maximum security 3facility or on disciplinary segregation is allowed contact 4visits. Any committed person found in possession of illegal 5drugs or who fails a drug test shall not be permitted contact 6visits for a period of at least 6 months. Any committed person 7involved in gang activities or found guilty of assault 8committed against a Department employee shall not be permitted 9contact visits for a period of at least 6 months. The 10Department shall offer every visitor appropriate written 11information concerning HIV and AIDS, including information 12concerning how to contact the Illinois Department of Public 13Health for counseling information. The Department shall 14develop the written materials in consultation with the 15Department of Public Health. The Department shall ensure that 16all such information and materials are culturally sensitive 17and reflect cultural diversity as appropriate. Implementation 18of the changes made to this Section by Public Act 94-629 is 19subject to appropriation. The Department shall seek the lowest 20possible cost to provide video calling and shall charge to the 21extent of recovering any demonstrated costs of providing video 22calling. The Department shall not make a commission or profit 23from video calling services. Nothing in this Section shall be 24construed to permit video calling instead of in-person 25visitation. 26    (f-5) (Blank).  HB4297- 5 -LRB104 17041 RLC 30456 b1    (f-10) The Department may not restrict or limit in-person 2visits to committed persons due to the availability of 3interactive video conferences.4    (f-15)(1) The Department shall issue a standard written 5policy for each institution and facility of the Department 6that provides for:7        (A) the number of in-person visits each committed 8    person is entitled to per week and per month including the 9    requirements of subsection (f) of this Section;10        (B) the hours of in-person visits;11        (C) the type of identification required for visitors 12    at least 18 years of age; and13        (D) the type of identification, if any, required for 14    visitors under 18 years of age. 15    (2) This policy shall be posted on the Department website 16and at each facility.17    (3) The Department shall post on its website daily any 18restrictions or denials of visitation for that day and the 19succeeding 5 calendar days, including those based on a 20lockdown of the facility, to inform family members and other 21visitors. 22    (g) All institutions and facilities of the Department 23shall permit religious ministrations and sacraments to be 24available to every committed person, but attendance at 25religious services shall not be required. This subsection (g) 26is subject to the provisions of the Faith Behind Bars Act.  HB4297- 6 -LRB104 17041 RLC 30456 b1    (h) Within 90 days after December 31, 1996, the Department 2shall prohibit the use of curtains, cell-coverings, or any 3other matter or object that obstructs or otherwise impairs the 4line of vision into a committed person's cell.5    (i) A point of contact person appointed under subsection 6(u-6) of Section 3-2-2 of this Code shall promptly and 7efficiently review suggestions, complaints, and other requests 8made by visitors to institutions and facilities of the 9Department and by other members of the public. Based on the 10nature of the submission, the point of contact person shall 11communicate with the appropriate division of the Department, 12disseminate the concern or complaint, and act as liaison 13between the parties to reach a resolution.14        (1) The point of contact person shall maintain 15    information about the subject matter of each 16    correspondence, including, but not limited to, information 17    about the following subjects:18            (A) the parties making the submission;19            (B) any commissary-related concerns;20            (C) any concerns about the institution or 21        facility's COVID-19 protocols and mitigations;22            (D) any concerns about mail, video, or electronic 23        messages or other communications with incarcerated 24        persons;25            (E) any concerns about the institution or 26        facility;  HB4297- 7 -LRB104 17041 RLC 30456 b1            (F) any discipline-related concerns;2            (G) any concerns about earned sentencing credits;3            (H) any concerns about educational opportunities 4        for incarcerated persons;5            (I) any concerns about health-related matters;6            (J) any mental health concerns;7            (K) any concerns about personal property;8            (L) any concerns about the records of the 9        incarcerated person;10            (M) any concerns about recreational opportunities 11        for incarcerated persons;12            (N) any staffing-related concerns;13            (O) any concerns about the transfer of individuals 14        in custody;15            (P) any concerns about visitation; and16            (Q) any concerns about work opportunities for 17        incarcerated persons.18        The information shall be maintained in accordance with 19    standards set by the Department of Corrections, and shall 20    be made available to the Department's Planning and 21    Research Division. The point of contact person shall 22    provide a summary of the results of the review, including 23    any resolution or recommendations made as a result of 24    correspondence with the Planning and Research Division of 25    the Department.26        (2) The Department shall provide an annual written   HB4297- 8 -LRB104 17041 RLC 30456 b1    report to the General Assembly and the Governor, with the 2    first report due no later than January 1, 2023, and 3    publish the report on its website within 48 hours after 4    the report is transmitted to the Governor and the General 5    Assembly. The report shall include a summary of activities 6    undertaken and completed as a result of submissions to the 7    point of contact person. The Department of Corrections 8    shall collect and report the following aggregated and 9    disaggregated data for each institution and facility and 10    describe:11            (A) the work of the point of contact person;12            (B) the general nature of suggestions, complaints, 13        and other requests submitted to the point of contact 14        person;15            (C) the volume of emails, calls, letters, and 16        other correspondence received by the point of contact 17        person;18            (D) the resolutions reached or recommendations 19        made as a result of the point of contact person's 20        review;21            (E) whether, if an investigation is recommended, a 22        report of the complaint was forwarded to the Chief 23        Inspector of the Department or other Department 24        employee, and the resolution of the complaint, and if 25        the investigation has not concluded, a detailed status 26        report on the complaint; and  HB4297- 9 -LRB104 17041 RLC 30456 b1            (F) any recommendations that the point of contact 2        person has relating to systemic issues in the 3        Department of Corrections, and any other matters for 4        consideration by the General Assembly and the 5        Governor.6        The name, address, or other personally identifiable 7    information of a person who files a complaint, suggestion, 8    or other request with the point of contact person, and 9    confidential records shall be redacted from the annual 10    report and are not subject to disclosure under the Freedom 11    of Information Act. The Department shall disclose the 12    records only if required by a court order on a showing of 13    good cause.14        (3) The Department must post in a conspicuous place in 15    the waiting area of every facility or institution a sign 16    that contains in bold, black type the following:17            (A) a short statement notifying visitors of the 18        point of contact person and that person's duty to 19        receive suggestions, complaints, or other requests; 20        and21            (B) information on how to submit suggestions, 22        complaints, or other requests to the point of contact 23        person. 24    (j) Menstrual hygiene products shall be available, as 25needed, free of charge, at all institutions and facilities of 26the Department for all committed persons who menstruate. In   HB4297- 10 -LRB104 17041 RLC 30456 b1this subsection (j), "menstrual hygiene products" means 2tampons and sanitary napkins for use in connection with the 3menstrual cycle. 4(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-331, eff. 1-1-24; 5104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-7-2.1 new)7    Sec. 3-7-2.1. Family notification.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Approved visitor" means any individual listed on a 10committed person's approved visitation roster maintained by 11the Department of Corrections.12    "Restrictive housing" or "solitary confinement" means any 13housing unit or cell-based separation restricting a committed 14person to the committed person's cell for more than 22 hours in 15a 24-hour period. 16    "Lockdown" means any facility-wide or unit-wide suspension 17of normal movement, visitation, or programming. 18    (b)(1) The Department of Corrections shall notify all 19approved visitors of a committed person when that person is: 20        (A) placed in restrictive housing;21        (B) removed from restrictive housing;22        (C) housed in a unit subject to lockdown; or23        (D) returned to normal operations following a 24    lockdown.25    (2) Notifications shall include only:  HB4297- 11 -LRB104 17041 RLC 30456 b1        (A) the committed person's name and identification 2    number;3        (B) whether the event is a lockdown or restrictive 4    housing placement;5        (C) the start date and time; and6        (D) the end date and time, once applicable. 7    (3) No security-sensitive details shall be disclosed. 8    (c)(1) Notification shall be provided via email and SMS 9text message, if the visitor opts in. 10    (2) The Department shall maintain an online portal for 11visitors to update contact information and select preferred 12notification methods. 13    (3) The Department may not charge committed persons or 14visitors any fee for receiving notifications. 15    (d)(1) Notification must be sent within 2 hours of the 16start of restrictive housing placement or lockdown affecting 17the committed person's housing unit. 18    (2) Notification of the end of confinement or lockdown 19must be sent within 2 hours of normal operations resuming. 20    (e) If a notification is sent in error, the Department 21shall issue a corrected notification within 2 hours of 22identifying the error.23    (f)(1) The Department shall maintain records of:24        (A) the number of notifications issued;25        (B) the timeliness of notifications;26        (C) any failures to notify; and   HB4297- 12 -LRB104 17041 RLC 30456 b1        (D) corrective actions taken. 2    (2) The Department shall publish an annual report 3summarizing compliance.4    (g) The Department shall adopt rules necessary to 5implement this Section, including:6        (1) visitor contact management; 7        (2) communication protocols; and8        (3) data privacy protections.  9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 101, 2027.